Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Land Quality
§ 35-11-425.
Designation of areas unsuitable for surface coal mining.

Any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected may petition the council to have an area designated as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations, or to have a designation terminated. The petition shall contain allegations of facts with supporting evidence which would tend to establish the allegations. Within ten (10) months after receipt of the petition the council shall hold a public hearing in the locality of the affected area, after appropriate notice and publication of the date, time and location of the hearing. After having filed a petition and before the hearing, any person may intervene by filing allegations of facts with supporting evidence which would tend to establish the allegations. Within sixty (60) days after the hearing, the council shall issue and furnish to the petitioner and any other party to the hearing, a written decision with reasons regarding the petition. The hearing need not be held if all petitioners reach agreement prior to the requested hearing and withdraw their request.

If petitioned, the council will review the particular area and:

Shall designate it as an area unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations if it is determined that reclamation pursuant to the requirements of this act is not technologically and economically feasible; and

May designate it as an area unsuitable for surface coal mining if the coal mining operation will:

Be incompatible with existing state or local land use plans or programs; or

Affect fragile or historic lands in which these operations could result in significant damage to important historic, cultural, scientific and esthetic values and natural systems; or

Affect renewable resource lands in which these operations could result in a substantial loss or reduction of long-range productivity of water supply or of food or fiber products, and these lands to include aquifers and aquifer recharge areas; or

Affect natural hazard lands in which these operations could substantially endanger life and property; these lands to include areas subject to frequent flooding and areas of unstable geology.

Prior to designating any land areas as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations, the administrator shall prepare a detailed statement on:

The potential coal resources of the area;

The demand for coal resources; and

The impact of this designation on the environment, economy and supply of coal.

The above process will include proper notice, opportunities for public and agency participation including land use planning bodies and a public hearing prior to designation or redesignation, pursuant to this section.

Any designation shall not prevent the mineral exploration pursuant to this act of any area so designated.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to lands on which surface coal mining operations were being conducted on August 3, 1977 or under a permit issued pursuant to this act, or where substantial legal and financial commitments in these operations were in existence prior to January 4, 1977.

This section shall not become effective until approval of a state program pursuant to P.L. 95-87 [30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.].

This section shall operate independently of all other sections of the act except as to the application of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 33, § 1; 1980, ch. 64, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Public Law 95-87, referred to in subsection (g), appears as 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 35-11-426.
In situ mineral mining permits and testing licenses.

Any person desiring to engage in situ mineral mining or research and development testing is governed by this act.

All provisions of this act applicable to a surface coal mining operation, as defined in W.S. 35-11-103(e)(xx), shall apply to coal in situ operations, regardless of whether such operations are connected with existing surface or underground coal mines, including research and development testing licenses, in addition to the requirements of W.S.

35-11-427

through

35-11-436

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1; 1980, ch. 64, § 2; 1996, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-427.
In situ mining permit; permit required; authority of land quality division exclusive.

Application for an in situ mining permit shall be made to the director. The director shall designate the land quality administrator as his representative on all matters concerning the application and all communications concerning review of and final action on the application for land, air and water quality divisions and solid waste management. Nothing herein shall be construed to limit the authority of the director on making the final decision on the permit application. No in situ mining operation shall be commenced or conducted unless a valid mining permit has been issued to the operator. Construction and completion of wells may be authorized prior to issuance of a mining permit or a research and development license pursuant to W.S. 35-11-404(g).

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1.

§ 35-11-428.
In situ mining permit; requirements for application; contents of application.

Application for an in situ mining permit shall meet the requirements of W.S. 35-11-406(a)(i) through (vi) and (viii) through (xiv), and shall contain a description of the proposed permit area including the following information relating to the applicable in situ technology:

Soils, vegetation, wildlife and surface hydrologic information consistent with the extent and nature of the proposed surface disturbance including descriptions of the soil, indigenous wildlife, natural gamma radiation background for lands to be impacted by radioactive materials, the vegetative cover, meteorological information and a description of any surface water and adjudicated water rights within the proposed permit area or on adjacent lands;

Geologic and groundwater hydrologic information including:

A description of the general geology including geochemistry and lithology of the permit area;

A characterization of the production zone and aquifers that may be affected including applicable hydrologic and water chemistry data to describe the projected effects of the mining activities.

A mine plan and a reclamation plan containing the information required by W.S. 35-11-406(b)(ii), (iv) and (viii) through (xix) and:

A description of the mining techniques;

A statement of the past, present and proposed postreclamation use of the land, groundwater and surface water;

A site facility description of the typical design criteria relevant to environmental protection;

A contour map which locates proposed equipment, facilities and appurtenances necessary to insure environmental protection;

An assessment of impact to water resources on adjacent lands that may reasonably be expected and the steps that will be taken to mitigate the impact;

Plans and procedures for environmental surveillance and excursion detection, prevention and control programs;

Procedures for land reclamation including preparation procedures, proposed seeding lists and methods, drainage reestablishment details, post-mining contour map, methods to be used to conduct post-mining radiological evaluations and the methods for mitigating any significant subsidence which may occur as a result of the mining operation;

Procedures for groundwater restoration; and

Estimated costs of reclamation computed in accordance with established engineering principles.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(iii)(I) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-11-429.
In situ mining permit; contents of permit.

Every permit shall:

Require the operator to give verbal notice of an excursion to the administrator as soon as practical after the excursion is confirmed, followed by reasonable written notice;

Authorize the administrator to terminate or modify the mining operation if an excursion cannot be controlled or mitigated within the constraints specified in the permit;

Authorize the council upon the recommendation of the director to modify water quality criteria used for groundwater restoration when information made available after issuance of the permit warrants a modification;

Prohibit any significant change in mining technique, method of operation, recovery fluid used, mining and reclamation plans or other activities that would jeopardize reclamation or protection of any waters of the state unless a permit revision has been approved by the director pursuant to this act;

Contain other conditions and requirements established by the director to employ the best practicable technology in carrying out this act.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-430.
Duties of in situ mining operator; records; annual report.

The operator shall submit an annual report containing the general categories of environmental protection and reclamation information pursuant to W.S.

35-11-411

.

The operator shall maintain records at the mine site of all information resulting from monitoring activities required in the permit. The records shall state:

The date, place, time and method of sampling and the personnel responsible for sampling;

The date on which analysis was performed and the personnel who performed the analysis;

Analytical techniques used; and

The results of the analysis.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1.

§ 35-11-431.
Research and development license; renewal; application.

A special license to conduct research and development testing may be issued by the administrator for a one (1) year period without a permit and may be renewed annually. An application for a research and development testing license shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and shall include:

The information required by W.S. 35-11-406(a)(i) through (vi), (viii) and (x);

A description of the nature and scope of the testing activity, of general groundwater hydrology and general geology including the production zone;

A statement of the present and proposed postreclamation use of the land;

A reclamation plan which includes the method for groundwater restoration, a statement of the type of vegetation and manner of proposed revegetation or other surface treatment of the affected area and an estimate of the costs of reclamation;

A timetable for the accomplishment of the reclamation plan;

All requirements of W.S. 35-11-406(j) and 35-11-406(p) or (q); and

Such other information as the administrator deems necessary or as good faith compliance with the provisions of this act requires.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1; 1996, ch. 53, § 1; 2020 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(vi) substituted “W.S. 35-11-406(j) and 35-11-406(p) or (q)” for “W.S. 35-11-406(j) and (k).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-432.
Research and development license; grounds for denial; appeal.

The administrator may deny the special license to conduct research and development testing if he believes the application violates the purpose of this act. The decision of the administrator may be appealed through the director to the council.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-433.
Research and development license; bond required; release or forfeiture; review of license.

If a special license to conduct research and development testing is granted, the administrator shall require the licensee to provide a bond in an amount necessary to insure complete reclamation.

A bond posted under the terms of this section shall be released upon completion of the reclamation program and an inspection by the administrator. Failure to comply with this act shall result in forfeiture of the bond.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-434.
Research and development license; notice of incomplete application; when application deemed complete.

The administrator shall notify an applicant within ninety (90) days of submission of the application whether or not it is complete. If an application is incomplete, the administrator shall state in writing to the applicant the additional substantive information required.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1.

§ 35-11-435.
Records to be filed on completion; abandoned drill holes.

Upon completion of reclamation and abandonment by the operator, the operator shall record with the state engineer’s office the location and nature of aquifers that have been affected by the in situ operation.

Any abandoned drill hole shall be subject to the provisions of W.S.

35-11-404

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1.

§ 35-11-436.
Existing in situ mining permits.

Any operator who possesses an in situ mining permit and license to mine shall have a period of one (1) year within which to show compliance with the requirements of W.S.

35-11-426

through

35-11-436

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 96, § 1.

§ 35-11-437.
Enforcement for surface coal mining operations.

The director or his designated authorized representative shall issue a cessation order covering that portion of the operation relevant to the violation or hazard and impose any necessary affirmative obligations if:

On the basis of an inspection, it is determined that a condition or practice exists, or violation is occurring, which creates an imminent danger to the public or which is causing or may reasonably be expected to cause significant, imminent environmental harm to land, air or water resources; or

Any violation of this article, land quality division regulations or permit conditions has not been abated within the time specified in the notice for abatement described in subsection (b) of this section, which period shall not exceed ninety (90) days.

The director or his designated authorized representative shall issue a notice fixing a reasonable time for abatement and impose any necessary affirmative obligations if:

On the basis of an inspection, it is determined that a permittee is in violation of this article, land quality division regulations or any permit conditions; and

A cessation order is not required under subsection (a) of this section.

Any notice or order issued pursuant to this section may be affirmed, modified, vacated or terminated by:

The director or his authorized representative; or

The council, if the operator or any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected files a petition for review within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the notice or order. The council shall order any necessary investigation and provide a public hearing, if requested. Any public hearing shall be conducted as a contested case proceeding in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The director or, in his absence, the administrator shall affirm, modify, vacate or terminate any notice or order issued pursuant to this section which results in or requires cessation of mining within forty-eight (48) hours of its issuance. If cessation is affirmed, the operator shall be notified of the decision and be afforded an opportunity to request a hearing within ten (10) days of the decision. If a hearing is requested, the director shall fix a time and place for hearing before the council within five (5) calendar days of the request. The council shall affirm, modify or set aside the director’s decision within forty-eight (48) hours following the adjournment of the hearing.

Any notice or order issued pursuant to this section may be temporarily stayed pending review by the council if requested by the operator. Any request for a stay shall contain a detailed statement giving reasons for granting the stay. The council shall issue a decision granting or denying the stay in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the council.

At the request of any person, a sum equal to the aggregate amount of all costs and expenses (including attorney’s fees) as determined by the council to have been reasonably incurred by the person for or in connection with his participation in the proceedings, including any judicial review of agency actions, may be assessed against either party as the court or the council deems proper. This subsection shall apply only to contested case proceedings or subsequent judicial review proceedings under the provisions of this act relating to the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations in accordance with P.L. 95-87 [30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.], as that law is worded on August 3, 1977. For payments from the department:

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 4, §§ 1, 2.

The contribution of a person who did not initiate a proceeding shall be separate and distinct from the contribution made by a person initiating the proceeding.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 4, §§ 1, 2.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 4, § 2.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 1; 1993, ch. 154, § 1; 1994, ch. 4, §§ 1, 2.

Federal reference. —

Public Law 95-87, referred to in the second sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection (f), appears as 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection (f), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Permit reviews are proceedings related to the enforcement of the act. —

Nonprofit citizen conservation organization was eligible for award of attorney fees when the organization challenged a permit review decision by the department of environmental quality and the challenge resulted in a settlement agreement, as department of environmental quality became a party when the conservation organization opposed the department's review decision, and because permit reviews are proceedings related to the enforcement scheme of the Wyoming environmental quality act. Powder River Basin Resource Council v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 869 P.2d 435,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1994).

Standing in federal action. —

Although plaintiff's suit against the state alleging that Wyoming's attorney's fees provision violated federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act, 30 USCS § 1270(a)(2), was ripe when filed and not barred by the Eleventh Amendment of the U. S. Constitution, plaintiff lost standing because of the Wyoming supreme court's decision in 1994 ordering defendant to pay plaintiff's attorney's fees, since at that point plaintiff lost the injury on which its standing was originally based. Powder River Basin Resource Council v. Babbitt, 54 F.3d 1477, 1995 U.S. App. LEXIS 8899 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1995).